incubator/apertium-tr-az/apertium-tr-az.tr.dix.xml
      <pardef n="ağla/mak__vblex">
        <e>
          <p>
            <l>rım</l>
            <r>mak<s n="vblex"/><s n="aff"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/><s n="stat"/></r>
          </p>
        </e>
        <e>
          <p>
            <l>r<b/>mıyım</l>
            <r>mak<s n="vblex"/><s n="aff"/><s n="pres"/><s n="int"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
          </p>
        </e>
        <e>
          <p>
            <l>mam</l>
            <r>mak<s n="vblex"/><s n="neg"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/><s n="stat"/></r>
          </p>
        </e>
        <e>
          <p>
            <l>maz<b/>mıyım</l>
            <r>mak<s n="vblex"/><s n="neg"/><s n="pres"/><s n="int"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
          </p>
        </e>
        <e>
          <p>
            <l>rsın</l>
            <r>mak<s n="vblex"/><s n="aff"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><s n="stat"/></r>
          </p>
        </e>
        <e>
          <p>
            <l>r<b/>mısın</l>
            <r>mak<s n="vblex"/><s n="aff"/><s n="pres"/><s n="int"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
          </p>
        </e>
        <e>
          <p>
            <l>mazsın</l>
            <r>mak<s n="vblex"/><s n="neg"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><s n="stat"/></r>
          </p>
        </e>
        <e>
          <p>
            <l>maz<b/>mısın</l>
            <r>mak<s n="vblex"/><s n="neg"/><s n="pres"/><s n="int"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
          </p>
        </e>
        <e>
          <p>
            <l>r</l>
            <r>mak<s n="vblex"/><s n="aff"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/><s n="stat"/></r>
          </p>
        </e>
        <e>
          <p>
            <l>r<b/>mı</l>
            <r>mak<s n="vblex"/><s n="aff"/><s n="pres"/><s n="int"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
          </p>
        </e>
        <e>
          <p>
            <l>maz</l>
            <r>mak<s n="vblex"/><s n="neg"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/><s n="stat"/></r>
          </p>
        </e>
        <e>
          <p>
            <l>maz<b/>mı</l>
            <r>mak<s n="vblex"/><s n="neg"/><s n="pres"/><s n="int"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
          </p>
        </e>
        <e>
          <p>
            <l>rız</l>
            <r>mak<s n="vblex"/><s n="aff"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/><s n="stat"/></r>
          </p>
        </e>
        <e>
          <p>
            <l>r<b/>mıyız</l>
            <r>mak<s n="vblex"/><s n="aff"/><s n="pres"/><s n="int"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
          </p>
        </e>
        <e>
          <p>
            <l>mayız</l>
            <r>mak<s n="vblex"/><s n="neg"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/><s n="stat"/></r>
          </p>
        </e>
        <e>
          <p>
            <l>maz<b/>mıyız</l>
            <r>mak<s n="vblex"/><s n="neg"/><s n="pres"/><s n="int"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
          </p>
        </e>
        <e>
          <p>
            <l>rsınız</l>
            <r>mak<s n="vblex"/><s n="aff"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><s n="stat"/></r>
          </p>
        </e>
        <e>
          <p>
            <l>r<b/>mısınız</l>
            <r>mak<s n="vblex"/><s n="aff"/><s n="pres"/><s n="int"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
          </p>
        </e>
        <e>
          <p>
            <l>mazsınız</l>
            <r>mak<s n="vblex"/><s n="neg"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><s n="stat"/></r>
          </p>
        </e>
        <e>
          <p>
            <l>maz<b/>mısınız</l>
            <r>mak<s n="vblex"/><s n="neg"/><s n="pres"/><s n="int"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
          </p>
        </e>
        <e>
          <p>
            <l>rlar</l>
            <r>mak<s n="vblex"/><s n="aff"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/><s n="stat"/></r>
          </p>
        </e>
        <e>
          <p>
            <l>rlar<b/>mı</l>
            <r>mak<s n="vblex"/><s n="aff"/><s n="pres"/><s n="int"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
          </p>
        </e>
        <e>
          <p>
            <l>mazlar</l>
            <r>mak<s n="vblex"/><s n="neg"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/><s n="stat"/></r>
          </p>
        </e>
        <e>
          <p>
            <l>mazlar<b/>mı</l>
            <r>mak<s n="vblex"/><s n="neg"/><s n="pres"/><s n="int"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
          </p>
        </e>
      </pardef>

      <e lm="ağlamak"><i>ağla</i><par n="ağla/mak__vblex"/></e>
      <e lm="alkışlamak"><i>alkışla</i><par n="ağla/mak__vblex"/></e>
      <e lm="ayıplamak"><i>ayıpla</i><par n="ağla/mak__vblex"/></e>
      <e lm="başlamak"><i>başla</i><par n="ağla/mak__vblex"/></e>
      <e lm="bulamak"><i>bula</i><par n="ağla/mak__vblex"/></e>
      <e lm="çatlamak"><i>çatla</i><par n="ağla/mak__vblex"/></e>
      <e lm="dağlamak"><i>dağla</i><par n="ağla/mak__vblex"/></e>
      <e lm="dalamak"><i>dala</i><par n="ağla/mak__vblex"/></e>
      <e lm="damlamak"><i>damla</i><par n="ağla/mak__vblex"/></e>
      <e lm="dolamak"><i>dola</i><par n="ağla/mak__vblex"/></e>
      <e lm="haşlamak"><i>haşla</i><par n="ağla/mak__vblex"/></e>
      <e lm="hatırlamak"><i>hatırla</i><par n="ağla/mak__vblex"/></e>
      <e lm="havlamak"><i>havla</i><par n="ağla/mak__vblex"/></e>
      <e lm="hazırlamak"><i>hazırla</i><par n="ağla/mak__vblex"/></e>
      <e lm="hırpalamak"><i>hırpala</i><par n="ağla/mak__vblex"/></e>
      <e lm="hoplamak"><i>hopla</i><par n="ağla/mak__vblex"/></e>
      <e lm="horlamak"><i>horla</i><par n="ağla/mak__vblex"/></e>
      <e lm="ısmarlamak"><i>ısmarla</i><par n="ağla/mak__vblex"/></e>
      <e lm="ışınlamak"><i>ışınla</i><par n="ağla/mak__vblex"/></e>
      <e lm="ihtiyarlamak"><i>ihtiyarla</i><par n="ağla/mak__vblex"/></e>
      <e lm="karalamak"><i>karala</i><par n="ağla/mak__vblex"/></e>
      <e lm="karışlamak"><i>karışla</i><par n="ağla/mak__vblex"/></e>
      <e lm="karşılamak"><i>karşıla</i><par n="ağla/mak__vblex"/></e>
      <e lm="katlamak"><i>katla</i><par n="ağla/mak__vblex"/></e>
      <e lm="koklamak"><i>kokla</i><par n="ağla/mak__vblex"/></e>
      <e lm="kovalamak"><i>kovala</i><par n="ağla/mak__vblex"/></e>
      <e lm="kucaklamak"><i>kucakla</i><par n="ağla/mak__vblex"/></e>
      <e lm="kurulamak"><i>kurula</i><par n="ağla/mak__vblex"/></e>
      <e lm="miyavlamak"><i>miyavla</i><par n="ağla/mak__vblex"/></e>
      <e lm="otlamak"><i>otla</i><par n="ağla/mak__vblex"/></e>
      <e lm="ovalamak"><i>ovala</i><par n="ağla/mak__vblex"/></e>
      <e lm="oylamak"><i>oyla</i><par n="ağla/mak__vblex"/></e>
      <e lm="paralamak"><i>parala</i><par n="ağla/mak__vblex"/></e>
      <e lm="parlamak"><i>parla</i><par n="ağla/mak__vblex"/></e>
      <e lm="patlamak"><i>patla</i><par n="ağla/mak__vblex"/></e>
      <e lm="pohpohlamak"><i>pohpohla</i><par n="ağla/mak__vblex"/></e>
      <e lm="rahatlamak"><i>rahatla</i><par n="ağla/mak__vblex"/></e>
      <e lm="sıralamak"><i>sırala</i><par n="ağla/mak__vblex"/></e>
      <e lm="sıvazlamak"><i>sıvazla</i><par n="ağla/mak__vblex"/></e>
      <e lm="suçlamak"><i>suçla</i><par n="ağla/mak__vblex"/></e>
      <e lm="sulamak"><i>sula</i><par n="ağla/mak__vblex"/></e>
      <e lm="şaşalamak"><i>şaşala</i><par n="ağla/mak__vblex"/></e>
      <e lm="tamamlamak"><i>tamamla</i><par n="ağla/mak__vblex"/></e>
      <e lm="tasarlamak"><i>tasarla</i><par n="ağla/mak__vblex"/></e>
      <e lm="tavlamak"><i>tavla</i><par n="ağla/mak__vblex"/></e>
      <e lm="uğurlamak"><i>uğurla</i><par n="ağla/mak__vblex"/></e>
      <e lm="yavaşlamak"><i>yavaşla</i><par n="ağla/mak__vblex"/></e>
      <e lm="zıplamak"><i>zıpla</i><par n="ağla/mak__vblex"/></e>
      <e lm="zırlamak"><i>zırla</i><par n="ağla/mak__vblex"/></e>
      <e lm="zorlamak"><i>zorla</i><par n="ağla/mak__vblex"/></e>
